Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-314 Perfection by control. (a)
A security interest in investment property, deposit accounts, letter-of-credit
rights, electronic chattel paper, or electronic documents may be perfected by
control of the collateral under section 490:7-106, 490:9-104, 490:9-105,
490:9-106, or 490:9-107.

(b) A security interest in deposit accounts,
electronic chattel paper, letter-of-credit rights, or electronic documents is
perfected by control under section 490:7-106, 490:9-104, 490:9-105, or
490:9-107 when the secured party obtains control and remains perfected by
control only while the secured party retains control.

(c) A security interest in investment property
is perfected by control under section 490:9-106 from the time the secured party
obtains control and remains perfected by control until:

(1) The secured party does not have control; and

(2) One of the following occurs:

(A) If the collateral is a certificated
security, the debtor has or acquires possession of the security certificate;

(B) If the collateral is an uncertificated
security, the issuer has registered or registers the debtor as the registered
owner; or

(C) If the collateral is a security
entitlement, the debtor is or becomes the entitlement holder. [L 2000, c 241,
pt of §1; am L 2004, c 163, §29]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next